Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.260

Statement, letter, and press release—Contents prohibited—Inquiries.

The statement, letter, and press release of the applicant issued pursuant to RCW 32.32.250 shall not include financial statements or describe the benefits of conversion or the value of the capital stock of the savings bank upon conversion. In replying to inquiries, the savings bank should limit its answers to the matters listed in RCW 32.32.255.

[ 1981 c 85 s 51.]